Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.180

Promotional printing and literature—Contracts.

(1) The restrictive provisions of chapter 43.19 RCW do not apply to promotional printing and literature for the commission.

(2) All promotional printing contracts entered into by the commission must be executed and performed under conditions of employment that substantially conform to the laws of this state respecting hours of labor, the minimum wage scale, and the rules and regulations of the department of labor and industries regarding conditions of employment, hours of labor, and minimum wages, and the violation of such a provision of any contract is grounds for cancellation of the contract.

[ 2015 c 225 s 15; 2009 c 33 s 19.]